Nevada, session 83, SB95.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 412.286 is hereby amended to read as follows:
412.286 1. Under Office regulations, limitations may be
placed on the powers granted by NRS 412.286 to 412.302,
inclusive, with respect to the kind and amount of punishment
authorized , [and] the categories of commanding officers and
warrant officers exercising command authorized to exercise those
powers [.] , the applicability of NRS 412.286 to 412.302, inclusive,
to an accused who demands trial by court-martial and the kinds of
courts-martial to which the case may be referred upon such a
-
*SB95*

– 2 –
demand. However, punishment may not be imposed upon any
member of the Nevada National Guard under NRS 412.286 to
412.302, inclusive, if the member has, before the imposition of
such punishment, demanded trial by court-martial in lieu of such
punishment. Under Office regulations, rules may be prescribed with
respect to the suspension of punishments authorized hereunder. If
authorized by Office regulations, a commanding officer exercising
general court-martial jurisdiction or an officer of general rank in
command may delegate his or her powers under NRS 412.286 to
412.302, inclusive, to a principal assistant.
2. When nonjudicial punishment has been imposed for an
offense, nonjudicial punishment may not again be imposed for the
same offense. Administrative action can be taken for the same
offense and will not be considered double punishment under the
Code. For the purposes of this subsection, “same offense” means an
offense that was part of a single incident or course of conduct.
3. After nonjudicial punishment has been imposed, it may not
be increased, upon appeal or otherwise, unless the punishment
imposed was not provided for in the Code.
4. When a commanding officer determines that nonjudicial
punishment is appropriate for a particular serviceman or
servicewoman, all known offenses determined to be appropriate for
disposition by nonjudicial punishment and ready to be considered at
that time, including, without limitation, all such offenses arising
from a single incident or course of conduct, must ordinarily be
considered together, rather than being made the basis for multiple
punishment.
5. Nonjudicial punishment may not be imposed for any offense
which was committed more than 3 years before the date of
imposition of punishment, unless such 3-year limitation is waived
by the accused in writing or unless the accused has filed an appeal
under this Code.
6. Nothing in subsection 2 or 4 precludes a commanding
officer from imposing, at one time, more than one punishment
nonjudicially for the offense or offenses arising from a single
incident or course of conduct authorized in the Code.
Sec. 2. NRS 412.2879 is hereby amended to read as follows:
412.2879 An accused facing nonjudicial punishment [does not
have] has the right to demand a trial by court-martial in lieu of
accepting the nonjudicial punishment [.] at any time before the
imposition of the nonjudicial punishment.
Sec. 3. NRS 412.293 is hereby amended to read as follows:
412.293 1. A commanding officer who, after inquiry or
investigation, determines that nonjudicial punishment is appropriate
for a particular serviceman or servicewoman shall use a formal
-
*SB95*

– 3 –
proceeding. In determining whether nonjudicial punishment is
appropriate, the commanding officer shall consult with a judge
advocate. The commanding officer may also consult with a superior
commissioned officer who is not the superior authority who is to act
on appeal pursuant to NRS 412.296.
2. If the commanding officer determines that a formal
proceeding is appropriate, the accused must be notified in writing
of:
(a) The intent of the commanding officer to initiate nonjudicial
punishment;
(b) The intent of the commanding officer to use a formal
proceeding;
(c) The maximum punishments allowable under the formal
proceeding;
(d) The right of the accused to remain silent;
(e) Each offense that the accused has allegedly committed with
reference to sections of the law that are alleged to have been
violated;
(f) The right of the accused to confront witnesses, examine the
evidence and submit matters in defense, extenuation and mitigation;
(g) The right of the accused to consult with a judge advocate and
the location of such counsel; [and]
(h) The right of the accused to demand a trial by court-martial
at any time before the imposition of the nonjudicial punishment;
and
(i) The right of the accused to appeal.
3. If the commanding officer determines that a formal
proceeding is appropriate, the accused must be given a reasonable
time to consult with counsel , [and] to gather matters in defense,
extenuation and mitigation [.] and to decide whether to accept the
nonjudicial punishment or to demand a trial by court-martial. This
decision period [of time] must be at least 48 hours, depending on the
availability of counsel, but such period [of time] may be extended at
the request of the accused.
4. The commanding officer is not bound by the formal rules of
evidence before courts-martial and may consider any matter the
commanding officer reasonably believes is relevant to the offense.
Sec. 4. The amendatory provisions of this act do not apply to
any formal proceeding relating to nonjudicial punishment for which
a serviceman or servicewoman has been issued written notice
pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS 412.293, as that subsection existed
on June 30, 2025, before July 1, 2025.
Sec. 5. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*SB95*